Massachusetts, session 194th, H2273.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The following words, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, shall
have the following meanings:
“Checkout Bag” shall mean a bag provided by a retail establishment to a customer at the
point of sale. Checkout bags shall not include: (i) bags, whether plastic or not, in which loose
produce or products are placed by the consumer to deliver such items to the point of sale or
check out area of the store; (ii) a paper bag provided by a pharmacy to a customer purchasing a
prescription medication; (iii) a non-handled bag used to protect items from damaging or
contaminating other purchased items; or (iv) a non-handled bag that is designed to be placed
over articles of clothing on a hanger.
of 3

“Retail Establishment” shall mean any business facility that sells goods directly to the
consumer whether for or not for profit, including but not limited to, retail stores, restaurants,
pharmacies, convenience and grocery stores, liquor stores, and seasonal and temporary
businesses.
SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any retail
establishment which makes available checkout bags in the Town of Sudbury shall charge for
each such bag equal to or greater than $0.10 per checkout bag, as established by regulations to be
duly promulgated by the Sudbury Board of Health.
(b) All monies collected pursuant to this section shall be retained by the retail
establishment.
(c) Any charge for a checkout bag shall be separately stated on a receipt provided to the
customer at the time of sale and shall be identified as the “checkout bag charge” thereon.
SECTION 3. (a) The Health Agent for the Sudbury Board of Health or his/her designee
shall have authority to enforce this law and any regulations promulgated thereunder. This law
may be enforced through any lawful means in law or in equity, including but not limited to,
noncriminal disposition pursuant to G.L. c. 40 § 21D and Article VI of the Town of Sudbury
General Bylaws.
(b) The Sudbury Board of Health may adopt and amend rules and regulations to
effectuate the purposes of this law.
SECTION 4. If any provision of this law is declared to be invalid or unenforceable, the
other provisions shall be severable and shall not be affected thereby.
of 3

SECTION 5. This act shall take effect three months after its passage.
of 3